Massachusetts, session 194th, H1468.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Center for African, Caribbean & Community Development at the
University of Massachusetts Boston shall be designated and known as the Senator Bill Owens
Center, in honor of his years of service and dedication to the people of the Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. The Chancellor of the University of Massachusetts Boston, in consultation
with the University of Massachusetts Board of Trustees, shall erect and maintain suitable
markers bearing such designation in compliance with university standards.
SECTION 3. Subject to appropriation, the Department of Higher Education shall provide
not less than $250,000 for the installation of such markers and for relevant programming to
commemorate the renaming of the Senator Bill Owens Center.
of 1